Utah statutes.
53-7-314.   Fees -- Setting -- Deposit -- Use.
(1)  The board shall establish fees authorized in this part in accordance with
the procedures specified in Section 63J-1-504, but the fees shall be deposited
as provided in Subsection (2).
(2)  Fees collected by the division under this part, shall be deposited with
the state treasurer as a nonlapsing dedicated credit, to be used for the
implementation of this part.
